lexc/noun/enhusator.lexc
LEXICON Posssatorunk
+Tem:^+cTem^kor             #;    ! kor
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m        Fam;  ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d        Fam;  ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§        Fam;  ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk         Fam;  ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k Fam;  ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k      Fam;  ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im    Fam;  ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id    Fam;  ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i     Fam;  ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;  ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k Fam; ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik    Fam;  !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                            Gen2;
!jászol
LEXICON AddNounAcc
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     PossAcc;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     FamAcc;

LEXICON PossAcc
+Tem:^+cTem^kor             #;    ! kor
                            Gen2Acc;

LEXICON FamAcc
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen3Acc;
                       Case2Acc;

LEXICON Gen2Acc
+Gens:^+cGens^é        CaseAcc;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     CaseAcc;
                       Case2Acc;

! This is the secret to have bokor+Noun[gcat]+Fam+Acc[lfea]
LEXICON Gen3Acc
+Gens:^+cGens^é        CaseAcc;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     CaseAcc;
                       CaseAcc;  !This one!!!

LEXICON CaseAcc
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t     #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON Case2Acc
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
!+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON AddNoun1jaszol
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss1jaszol;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur1jaszol;

LEXICON Poss1jaszol
!+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
!+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA2§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t       #;    ! ot, et, öt, t
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam1jaszol;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam1jaszol;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam1jaszol;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam1jaszol;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam1jaszol;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam1jaszol;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam1jaszol;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam1jaszol;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam1jaszol;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam1jaszol;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam1jaszol;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam1jaszol;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                                  Gen1jaszol; !required

LEXICON Plur1jaszol
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k     Gen1jaszol;
!                            Gen1jaszol; !required
        
LEXICON Fam1jaszol
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen1jaszol;
                       Gen1jaszol;

LEXICON Gen1jaszol
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case1jaszol;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi       Case1jaszol;
                         Case1jaszol;
 
LEXICON Case1jaszol
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t     #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
!+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^t     #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON Noun
abrakjászol AddNoun1jaszol;
abrakjászol AddNounAcc;
acélvászon AddNounAcc;
agyagjászol AddNoun1jaszol;
agyagjászol AddNounAcc;
algafátyol AddNounAcc;
alkoholfátyol AddNounAcc;
alátétvászon AddNounAcc;
apácafátyol AddNounAcc;
aranyfátyol AddNounAcc;
arcfátyol AddNounAcc;
autófátyol AddNounAcc;
ballonvászon AddNounAcc;
betonjászol AddNoun1jaszol;
betonjászol AddNounAcc;
betétvászon AddNounAcc;
betűkazal AddNounAcc;
bodorvászon AddNounAcc;
boldogságfátyol AddNounAcc;
borítékvászon AddNounAcc;
borítóvászon AddNounAcc;
butaságfátyol AddNounAcc;
bálakazal AddNounAcc;
bélésvászon AddNounAcc;
bíborfátyol AddNounAcc;
búfátyol AddNounAcc;
bútorvászon AddNounAcc;
búzakazal AddNounAcc;
bőrvászon AddNounAcc;
cementfátyol AddNounAcc;
cipőbélésvászon AddNounAcc;
csalánfátyol AddNounAcc;
csalánvászon AddNounAcc;
csepűvászon AddNounAcc;
csillámvászon AddNounAcc;
csinatvászon AddNounAcc;
csinvatvászon AddNounAcc;
csipkefátyol AddNounAcc;
csiszolóvászon AddNounAcc;
csomagolóvászon AddNounAcc;
cérnavászon AddNounAcc;
damasztvászon AddNounAcc;
darócvászon AddNounAcc;
derítővászon AddNounAcc;
díszletvászon AddNounAcc;
dörzsvászon AddNounAcc;
egészvászon AddNounAcc;
emberkazal AddNounAcc;
ernyővászon AddNounAcc;
etetőjászol AddNoun1jaszol;
etetőjászol AddNounAcc;
ezüstfátyol AddNounAcc;
ezüstjászol AddNoun1jaszol;
ezüstjászol AddNounAcc;
ezüstvászon AddNounAcc;
fajászol AddNoun1jaszol;
fajászol AddNounAcc;
farmervászon AddNounAcc;
fehérneművászon AddNounAcc;
fejfátyol AddNounAcc;
felhőfátyol AddNounAcc;
festővászon AddNounAcc;
filmvászon AddNounAcc;
flastromvászon AddNounAcc;
fodorvászon AddNounAcc;
fonadékfátyol AddNounAcc;
formavászon AddNounAcc;
foskazal AddNounAcc;
fátyol AddNounAcc;
félfátyol AddNounAcc;
félvászon AddNounAcc;
fényfátyol AddNounAcc;
füstfátyol AddNounAcc;
gitárfátyol AddNounAcc;
gondolatfátyol AddNounAcc;
grádlivászon AddNounAcc;
gumifátyol AddNounAcc;
gumivászon AddNounAcc;
gyapjúfátyol AddNounAcc;
gyapotvászon AddNounAcc;
gyolcsvászon AddNounAcc;
gyászfátyol AddNounAcc;
gyöngyvászon AddNounAcc;
gőzfátyol AddNounAcc;
habarcsfátyol AddNounAcc;
hajfátyol AddNounAcc;
hajkazal AddNounAcc;
hangfátyol AddNounAcc;
hangvászon AddNounAcc;
harangfátyol AddNounAcc;
harmatfátyol AddNounAcc;
hirdetővászon AddNounAcc;
háttérfátyol AddNounAcc;
háttérvászon AddNounAcc;
házivászon AddNounAcc;
hímzővászon AddNounAcc;
hócsalánvászon AddNounAcc;
hőfátyol AddNounAcc;
időfátyol AddNounAcc;
imafátyol AddNounAcc;
ingvászon AddNounAcc;
iratkazal AddNounAcc;
irányvászon AddNounAcc;
jurtavászon AddNounAcc;
jutavászon AddNounAcc;
jászol AddNoun1jaszol;
jászol AddNounAcc;
kalapfátyol AddNounAcc;
kapcavászon AddNounAcc;
kartonvászon AddNounAcc;
kazal AddNounAcc;
kendervászon AddNounAcc;
kivetítővászon AddNounAcc;
komposztkazal AddNounAcc;
kreppvászon AddNounAcc;
kukoricakazal AddNounAcc;
kártfátyol AddNounAcc;
kékvászon AddNounAcc;
képvászon AddNounAcc;
kérvénykazal AddNounAcc;
ködfátyol AddNounAcc;
ködvászon AddNounAcc;
könnyfátyol AddNounAcc;
könyvkötővászon AddNounAcc;
könyvvászon AddNounAcc;
körvászon AddNounAcc;
kötözővászon AddNounAcc;
kőjászol AddNoun1jaszol;
kőjászol AddNounAcc;
lakkvászon AddNounAcc;
lenvászon AddNounAcc;
lepedővászon AddNounAcc;
lucernakazal AddNounAcc;
lószőrvászon AddNounAcc;
mamutvászon AddNounAcc;
matracvászon AddNounAcc;
matrózvászon AddNounAcc;
mellfátyol AddNounAcc;
mellvászon AddNounAcc;
menyasszonyfátyol AddNounAcc;
merevítővászon AddNounAcc;
molinóvászon AddNounAcc;
mozivászon AddNounAcc;
munkaruhavászon AddNounAcc;
munkásvászon AddNounAcc;
muszkavászon AddNounAcc;
muszlinfátyol AddNounAcc;
mészfátyol AddNounAcc;
műanyagvászon AddNounAcc;
művászon AddNounAcc;
művészvászon AddNounAcc;
nyakfátyol AddNounAcc;
nyersvászon AddNounAcc;
nyugágyvászon AddNounAcc;
nászfátyol AddNounAcc;
olajvászon AddNounAcc;
oldalvászon AddNounAcc;
pakolóvászon AddNounAcc;
pamutlenvászon AddNounAcc;
pamutvászon AddNounAcc;
panamavászon AddNounAcc;
papiroskazal AddNounAcc;
papírkazal AddNounAcc;
parasztvászon AddNounAcc;
parkettcsiszolóvászon AddNounAcc;
patyolatfátyol AddNounAcc;
patyolatvászon AddNounAcc;
pelyvakazal AddNounAcc;
pikévászon AddNounAcc;
poliészterfátyol AddNounAcc;
poliésztervászon AddNounAcc;
ponyvavászon AddNounAcc;
porfátyol AddNounAcc;
portrévászon AddNounAcc;
projektorvászon AddNounAcc;
présvászon AddNounAcc;
puskavászon AddNounAcc;
párafátyol AddNounAcc;
pókhálófátyol AddNounAcc;
pólyavászon AddNounAcc;
pörköltvászon AddNounAcc;
rajzolóvászon AddNounAcc;
rajzvászon AddNounAcc;
recefátyol AddNounAcc;
redőnyvászon AddNounAcc;
rolóvászon AddNounAcc;
rongyvászon AddNounAcc;
rozskazal AddNounAcc;
rugóvászon AddNounAcc;
rőzsekazal AddNounAcc;
sakkvászon AddNounAcc;
sejtvászon AddNounAcc;
selyemfátyol AddNounAcc;
selyemvászon AddNounAcc;
silókazal AddNounAcc;
smirglivászon AddNounAcc;
szabóvászon AddNounAcc;
szakmakazal AddNounAcc;
szalmakazal AddNounAcc;
szemfátyol AddNounAcc;
szigetelővászon AddNounAcc;
szintetizátorfátyol AddNounAcc;
szitavászon AddNounAcc;
sztreccsvászon AddNounAcc;
szurkosvászon AddNounAcc;
szurokvászon AddNounAcc;
szárkazal AddNounAcc;
szénakazal AddNounAcc;
színkazal AddNounAcc;
szövegvászon AddNounAcc;
szövetfátyol AddNounAcc;
szőnyegvászon AddNounAcc;
szűrőfátyol AddNounAcc;
szűrővászon AddNounAcc;
sátorlapvászon AddNounAcc;
sátorvászon AddNounAcc;
takarmánykazal AddNounAcc;
takaróvászon AddNounAcc;
tetővászon AddNounAcc;
textilfátyol AddNounAcc;
textilvászon AddNounAcc;
titokfátyol AddNounAcc;
tollfátyol AddNounAcc;
tónusfátyol AddNounAcc;
tüllfátyol AddNounAcc;
tüllvászon AddNounAcc;
tündérfátyol AddNounAcc;
tűzfátyol AddNounAcc;
utazófátyol AddNounAcc;
vadászvászon AddNounAcc;
varázsfátyol AddNounAcc;
vasalóvászon AddNounAcc;
vaskazal AddNounAcc;
vetítővászon AddNounAcc;
viaszkosvászon AddNounAcc;
viaszosvászon AddNounAcc;
viaszvászon AddNounAcc;
videovászon AddNounAcc;
virágfátyol AddNounAcc;
virágkazal AddNounAcc;
vitorlavászon AddNounAcc;
vászon AddNounAcc;
vászonfátyol AddNounAcc;
végvászon AddNounAcc;
vérfátyol AddNounAcc;
vízfátyol AddNounAcc;
webvászon AddNounAcc;
zabolójászol AddNoun1jaszol;
zabolójászol AddNounAcc;
zabszalmakazal AddNounAcc;
zsombolyakazal AddNounAcc;
zsákvászon AddNounAcc;
zúzmarafátyol AddNounAcc;
ágyneművászon AddNounAcc;
árnyfátyol AddNounAcc;
árnyékolóvászon AddNounAcc;
óriásvászon AddNounAcc;
ózonfátyol AddNounAcc;
üvegfátyol AddNounAcc;
üvegvászon AddNounAcc;
